test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-bechdub_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - bəčdub: # Verb pg 207 'eng knock sm down' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     bəčdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcSg1: ˀubəčdubš # knocked me down
     bəčdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcSg2: ˀubəčdubicid # knocked you Sg down
     bəčdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcSP3: ˀubəčdxʷ # knocked him/her/it/them down
     bəčdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcPl1: ˀubəčdubuɬ # knocked us down
     bəčdub+V+TV+Asp/Prf+OcPl2: ˀubəčdubuɬəd # knocked you (guys) down
